Utah statutes.
17-11-1.   Election to determine.

The county seats of the several counties of this state as now fixed by law are hereby recognized as such. No county seat shall be removed unless two-thirds of the qualified electors of the county, voting on the proposition at a general election, shall vote in favor of such removal, and two-thirds of the votes cast on the proposition shall be required to relocate a county seat.



No Change Since 1953

